02_Morphology/grn.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%>                   ! Frontera de morfema
%<n%>                ! Nombre
%<gen%>              ! Genitivo
%<loc%>              ! Locativo
%{m%}		     ! Multichar_Symbols
%<der_kue%>          ! derivational suffix
%-{m}e               ! VowAton
%{g%}                ! archiphoneme k
%{n%}                ! archiphoneme g
%<pl%>               ! Plural
%{s%}                ! archiphoneme 

LEXICON Root

Nouns ;

LEXICON N

%<n%>: CASE ;
%<n%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON SUBST

%<der_kue%>:%>kue # "weight: 1.0" ;

LEXICON CASE-NAS

%<nom%>: # ; ! ""
%<loc%>:%>%{m%}e # ; ! "a, en"
%<gen%>:%>gui #; ! "de"

LEXICON CASE

%<nom%>: # ; ! ""
%<gen%>:%>gui #; ! "de"
%<loc%>:%>%{m%}e # ; ! "a, en"

LEXICON N-SPA

:%{s%} N ; 

LEXICON Nouns

ava:ava N ; ! "raza, gente"
óga:óga N ; ! "casa"
irũ:irũ N ; ! "amigo"
apyka:apyka N ; ! "silla"
tembiasa N ; ! "experiencia"
tembiasakue N ; ! "historia"
irũ:irũ N ; ! "amigo"
asociación:asociación N-SPA ;
declaración:declaración N-SPA ;

LEXICON PL

%<pl%>:%>%{n%}%{g%}uéra CASE ;
